Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.080

Removal of appointive officers—Statement of reasons to be filed.

Whenever the governor is satisfied that any officer not liable to impeachment has been guilty of misconduct, or malfeasance in office, or is incompetent, he or she shall file with the secretary of state a statement showing his or her reasons, with his or her order of removal, and the secretary of state shall forthwith send a certified copy of such order of removal and statement of causes by registered mail to the last known post office address of the officer in question.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5018; 1965 c 8 s 43.06.080. Prior: 1893 c 101 s 2; RRS s 10989.]